Hawaii, session 2026, GM1194.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
PART I
SECTION 1. Section 291C-161, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (g) to read as follows:
"(g) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, fines
collected pursuant to chapter 291L and section 291C-108 shall be
deposited into the automated speed enforcement systems program
special fund established under section 291L-10 and shall be
expended [-in the county in which the fine wuo impooed, ] for
purposes that include the establishment, implementation,
operation, oversight, management, maintenance, and repair of an
automated speed enforcement system and implementation of the
automated speed enforcement systems program."
SECTION 2. Section 291L-3, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows:
" (a) The State shall establish and implement, in
accordance with this chapter, an automated speed enforcement
system imposing monetary liability on the registered owner of a
2026-2520 SB3157 CDl SMA-3.docx

Page 2
S.B. NO.
motor vehicle for violations of section 291C-108. The State
shall provide for the:
(1) Procurement, location, and oversight of an automated
speed enforcement system; and
(2) Installation, operation, maintenance, and repair of
the automated speed enforcement system through a
third-party contractor[—]£
provided that the department may reissue procurement for the
automated speed enforcement system every five years; provided
further that this provision shall not apply to any contract for
the operation of the automated speed enforcement systems program
executed before July 1, 2026. Upon the expiration of any
contract, including all renewal terms exercised thereunder, any
subsequent procurement and contract shall comply with the
requirements of this section. Where the automated speed
enforcement system affects county property, the department shall
cooperate with and assist the county as needed to install,
maintain, and repair the automated speed enforcement system
established pursuant to this chapter."
SECTION 3. Section 291L-10, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
2026-2520 SB3157 CDl SMA-3.docx 2
IIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIIHH

Page 3
S.B. NO.
" [-[■] §291L-1O [•}■] Automated speed enforcement systems
program special fund; established. (a) There is established in
the state treasury an automated speed enforcement systems
program special fund to be administered by the department, into
which shall be deposited all fines collected pursuant to this
chapter and section 291C-108.
(b) Moneys in the automated speed enforcement systems
program special fund shall be expended by the department [ift-fefee
eettftfey—whieh-^fehe-^ifte—wee—impesedT-] for the establishment,
implementation, operation, oversight, management, maintenance,
and repair of an automated speed enforcement system and
implementation of the automated speed enforcement systems
program.
(c) All unencumbered and unexpended moneys in excess of
$12,000,000 remaining in the automated speed enforcement systems
program special fund at the close of June 30 of each year shall
lapse to the credit of the state general fund.”
PART II
SECTION 4. Section 291J-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
2026-2520 SB3157 CDl SMA-3.docx 3
iniiiiHiiiilinMiiiiiiiiiiiiiii

Page 4 S.B. NO. ’ '2
h d
" [-E] §291J-2 [-3-] Photo red light imaging detector systems
program; established. There is established the photo red light
imaging detector systems program to enforce the traffic-control
signal laws of the State, which may be implemented by the State
or any county following completion of a pilot program in the
city and county of Honolulu, on any state or county highways
within the respective county[—]; provided that the photo red
light imaging detector systems program shall be subject to the
expansion limitations pursuant to section 291L-2(b). Nothing in
this chapter shall be deemed to supersede or override any
provision of chapter 291D."
SECTION 5. Section 291L-2, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
" [-[-] §291L-2 [9-] Automated speed enforcement systems
program; established. (a) There shall be established the
automated speed enforcement systems program, which shall be
implemented by the State to enforce the speed restriction laws
of the State. The automated speed enforcement [eye^eift] systems
program shall be limited to [only—thooe -locationD where a photo
red light imaging detector system hao been implemcntod purouant
to chapter-■5-91J. ] any county with a population of five hundred
2026-2520 SB3157 CDl SMA-3.docx

Page 5 S.B. NO. ""2
thousand or more and may be implemented in any high-risk
location of a state or county highway as determined by the
department based on an analysis of the studies conducted
pursuant to section 291L-3(c).
(b) The expansion of the automated speed enforcement
program and the photo red light imaging detector systems program
established pursuant to chapter 291J shall be subject to the
following limitations;
(1) The department shall implement new enforcement systems
at not more than ten new locations per calendar year.
For the purposes of calculating this annual limit, a
single location or intersection shall be counted as
one location, regardless of whether it is equipped
with an automated speed enforcement system, a photo
red light imaging detector system, or both; and
J2) The department shall implement new enforcement systems
at not more than two new locations within any single
state senatorial district during any calendar year,
utilizing the same counting method established in
paragraph (1).
2026-2520 SB3157 CDl SMA-3.docx

Page 6
S.B. NO.
(c) The department may consult with the judiciary
regarding implementation; provided further that the judiciary
shall not control or delay the department's authority to
determine camera locations or implementation timelines."
PART III
SECTION 6. Section 291J-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending the definition of "county" to read as
follows:
""County" means [the—eountioo of Hawaii,—Ka-uai,—and-Maui,
and the city and county of Honolulu.] any county having a
population of five hundred thousand or more."
PART IV
SECTION 7. If any provision of this Act, or the
application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held
invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or
applications of the Act that can be given effect without the
invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions
of this Act are severable.
SECTION 8. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.

2026-2520 SB3157 CDl SMA-3.docx 6
HNnniHIMIilllHIIIIMIBM

Page 7
S.B. NO.
SECTION 9. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2026-2520 SB3157 CDl SMA-3.docx 7

S.B. NO. ""2
APPROVED this Sth day of June , 2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

S.B.No. 3157, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
198-26

SB No. 3157, HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date; May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives